Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3323
Legal service insurance corporation; supervision, rehabilitation, conservation, dissolution, or liquidation; procedures.

Any supervision, rehabilitation, conservation, dissolution, or liquidation of a corporation organized under sections 44-3312 and 44-3313 shall be conducted pursuant to the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 23;

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 76.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.